Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1825.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Section 16-821, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-821. County committee; vacancy in office of precinct committeeman A. At the primary election the members of a political party who are entitled to representation pursuant to section 16-804 residing and who reside in each precinct shall choose one of their number as a county precinct committeeman, and the members shall choose one additional precinct committeeman for each one hundred twenty-five voters or major fraction thereof who are registered in the party in the precinct as reported pursuant to section 16-168, subsection G H on January 2 of the year in which the general election is held. The whole number of precinct committeemen of a political party shall constitute the county committee of the party. B. The board of supervisors upon on the recommendation of the county chairman, or the recommendation of a committee designated in the bylaws of the county committee for that purpose, shall determine when a vacancy exists in the office of precinct committeeman. If a vacancy exists, the vacancy shall be filled by the board of supervisors from a list of names submitted by the county legislative district chairman for a district that is organized pursuant to section 16-823, or by the county chairman, in all other cases, of the appropriate political party within thirty days after the date on which the complete and correct list of names is submitted to the board of supervisors. A person who wishes to fill the precinct committeeman vacancy shall submit an application to the chairman who is authorized to submit the list of names for that vacancy.  Only a precinct committeeman who is elected at the primary election prior to before the date of a state or county committee organizing meeting shall be permitted allowed to vote at such the meeting. The criteria used to establish when a vacancy exists in the office of precinct committeeman shall be as established in section 38-291.END_STATUTE